Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT PROPOSED.new text end new text begin An amendment to the Minnesota Constitution is proposed to the people. If the amendment is adopted, a section shall be added to article IV, to read: new text end new text begin Sec. 27. new text end new text begin Passage of any law that authorizes public funding for the design, construction, or renovation of a professional sports facility requires the vote of at least two-thirds of the members of each house of the legislature. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SUBMISSION TO VOTERS.new text end new text begin The proposed amendment must be submitted to the people at the 2026 general election. The question submitted must be: new text end new text begin "Shall the Minnesota Constitution be amended to require a two-thirds supermajority vote of the legislature to authorize public funding for a professional sports facility? new text end new text begin Yes . new text end new text begin No . new text end new text begin " new text end